Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF1319.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin APPROPRIATION; SEXUAL AND REPRODUCTIVE HEALTH SERVICES GRANTS.new text end new text begin $1,500,000 in fiscal year 2026 and $1,500,000 in fiscal year 2027 are appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of health for distribution under Minnesota Statutes, section 145.925. new text end